Hawaii statutes.
[§432G-21] Federal law compliance. All
dental insurers shall comply with applicable federal law. The commissioner
shall enforce the consumer protections and market reforms relating to insurance
as set forth in the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public
Law 111-148. [L 2013, c 191, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next